Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-2144
Directional boring contractor; activities authorized.

A person who is a directional boring contractor may install underground conduit under the direct supervision of a Class A master electrician, Class B master electrician, journeyman electrician, or Class B journeyman electrician who is employed by an electrical contractor.

Laws 2019, LB65, § 4.